Washington statutes.
RCW 26.23.070

Payments to registry—Methods—Immunity from civil liability.

(1) The employer or the employment security department may combine amounts withheld from the earnings of more than one responsible parent in a single payment to the Washington state support registry, listing separately the amount of the payment which is attributable to each individual.

(2) No employer nor employment security department that complies with an income withholding order under this chapter shall be civilly liable to the responsible parent for complying with an income withholding order under this chapter.

(3) No employer shall be civilly liable to the responsible parent for:

(a) Reporting a lump sum payment under this chapter; or

(b) Withholding and remitting a lump sum payment under this chapter or under chapter 74.20A RCW.

(4) No insurance company shall be civilly liable to the responsible parent for complying with:

(a) An order to withhold and deliver issued under RCW 74.20A.080 or with any other withholding order issued under this chapter;

(b) A lien filed by the department under chapter 74.20A RCW; or

(c) A combined lien and withholding order developed by the department to implement chapter 168, Laws of 2021.

(5) An insurance company complying with a withholding order issued by the department or with a lien filed by the department may not be considered to be committing a violation of the insurance fair conduct act under chapter 48.30 RCW.

[ 2023 c 248 s 4; 2021 c 168 s 4; 1991 c 367 s 41; 1987 c 435 s 7.]

NOTES:

Findings—2023 c 248: See note following RCW 26.23.063.

Findings—Rules—Effective date—2021 c 168: See notes following RCW 26.23.037.

Severability—Effective date—Captions not law—1991 c 367: See notes following RCW 26.09.015.